Utah statutes.
49-13-403.   Allowance payable by lump-sum payment.

(1)  If a retiree's allowance, as computed under Section 49-13-402, amounts to $25 or less, the allowance may be settled by the office by making a lump-sum payment of an amount actuarially equivalent to the allowance.

(2)  A payment made under this section constitutes a full and complete settlement of the retiree's claim against this system.

